West Virginia, session 2026, HB4655.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 34. Laken's Law §18-34-1. Laken's Law. (a) The Fentanyl Prevention and Awareness Education Act or "Laken’s Law" would help prevent overdose deaths in teens and young adults due to fentanyl and fentanyl components. This shall be accomplished through education of students in grades 6-12 3-12 in all public schools and be mandated annually using the following methods:(1) Students will shall be taught about fentanyl, heroin, and opioids awareness, prevention, and abuse;(2) Students will shall be instructed in the life-saving use of FDA-approved opioid reversal agents;(3) Students will shall be instructed on the prevention of the abuse of and addiction to fentanyl;(4) Students will shall be instructed on available state and community resources and organizations that work to prevent and reduce youth substance use; and (5) Students will shall receive health education covering the issues of substance abuse and youth substance abuse in particular.(b) This mandatory instruction will begin in the 2024-2025 school year.(c) The mandatory instructions for the expanded instruction including grades 3-5 shall begin in the 2026-2027 school year.